Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4610
Modification of agreement.

(a) By mutual consent, the parents of a child may modify an agreement regarding custodial responsibility made pursuant to sections 43-4608 to 43-4612.

(b) If an agreement is modified under subsection (a) of this section before deployment of a deploying parent, the modification must be in writing and signed by both parents and any nonparent who will exercise custodial responsibility under the modified agreement.

(c) If an agreement is modified under subsection (a) of this section during deployment of a deploying parent, the modification must be agreed to in a record by both parents and any nonparent who will exercise custodial responsibility under the modified agreement.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 10.